South Dakota, session 2026, HB1039.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 13-33A:
Before participating in an athletic activity sponsored by, or affiliated with, a public
or private school, a student shall undergo, within one year of the first day of the activity's
season, a pre-participation physical examination.
A pre-participation physical examination must be performed by a licensed health
care practitioner, acting within the practitioner's scope of practice. The practitioner shall
document the examination using a physical evaluation form approved by the Department
of Health. The form must include questions on the student's personal and family history
related to cardiac health.
A student may not participate in an athletic activity described in this section unless
the student provides a copy of the form, signed by the practitioner, to the administrator
of the student’s school.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 13-33A:
The Department of Health shall develop, using guidelines set forth by nationally
recognized organizations focused on cardiac health, a document that provides information
on sudden cardiac arrest and the screening options available to detect conditions that may
lead to sudden cardiac arrest.
The department shall post the document to the department's website and send a
copy of the document to every school district.
At the beginning of each academic year, every school district must distribute the
document to all students.
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 34-24:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.364.17 2 1039
A licensed health care practitioner who performs a physical examination of a minor
shall evaluate the minor's personal and family history related to cardiac health.
Section 4. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 34-24:
The Department of Health shall develop informational materials on child cardiac
health for medical practitioners. The materials must address how to:
(1) Identify symptoms of sudden cardiac arrest that require referral to a cardiologist;
(2) Obtain a detailed medical history and perform a cardiovascular physical
examination;
(3) Recognize normal structural changes of the heart;
(4) Recognize prodromal symptoms that precede sudden cardiac arrest; and
(5) Review the major etiologies of sudden cardiac death.
The materials must be posted on the department's website.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.